Massachusetts, session 194th, S2086.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the words “6.25 percent” and inserting in place thereof the words “5.84 percent”.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of Chapter 64I of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the words “6.25 percent” and inserting in place thereof the words “5.84 percent”.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the words “5.84 percent” and inserting in place thereof the words “5.43 percent”.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of Chapter 64I of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the words “5.84 percent” and inserting in place thereof the words “5.43 percent”.
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 2 of chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the words “5.43 percent” and inserting in place thereof the words “5 percent”.
SECTION 6. Section 2 of Chapter 64I of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the words “5.43 percent” and inserting in place thereof the words “5 percent”.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on August 1st, 2026.
SECTION 8. Sections 3 and 4 shall take effect on August 1st, 2027.
SECTION 9. Sections 5 and 6 shall take effect on August 1st 2028.
of 2